fi: Mediaosio: Liiketoiminta ja rahoitus; Viihde; Yleiset uutiset; Elämäntapa; Politiikka; Urheilu; Tabloid; Muu
th: ส่วนสื่อ: ธุรกิจและการเงิน; ความบันเทิง; ข่าวทั่วไป; ไลฟ์สไตล์; การเมือง; กีฬา; แท็บลอยด์; อื่นๆ
fr: Section du média: Affaires et finances; Divertissement; Nouvelles générales; Mode de vie; Politique; Sport; Tabloïde; Autre
zh-TW: 多媒體檔案區塊: 商業與金融; 娛樂; 一般消息; 生活風格; 政治; 運動; 小報; 其他
sk-SK: Mediálna sekcia: Obchod a financie; Zábava; Všeobecné správy; Životný štýl; Politika; Šport; Bulvárny denník; Iné
en: Media section: Business & finance; Entertainment; General news; Lifestyle; Politics; Sport; Tabloid; Other
ko: 미디어 섹션: 비즈니스 & 금융; 엔터테인먼트; 일반 뉴스; 라이프스타일; 정치; 스포츠; 타블로이드; 기타
tr: Medya Bölümü: İş ve finans; Eğlence; Genel Haberler; Yaşam tarzı; Politika; Spor; Tabloit gazete; Diğer
hr-HR: Medijska kategorija: Posao i financije; Zabava; Opće vijesti; Životni stil; Politika; Sport; Tabloid; Ostalo
zh-CN: 媒体领域: 商业与金融; 娱乐; 一般新闻; 生活方式; 政治; 体育; Tabloid; 其他
pl: Sekcja mediów: Biznes i finanse; Rozrywka; Wiadomości ogólne; Styl życia; Politycy; Sport; Tabloid; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Področje medijev: Posel in finance; Zabava; Splošne novice; Življenjski slog; Politika; Šport; Tabloid; Drugo
it: Sezione media: Affari e finanza; Intrattenimento; Notizie generali; Lifestyle; Politica; Sport; Tabloid; Altro
pt-BR: Seção de mídia: Negócios e finanças; Entretenimento; Notícias gerais; Estilo de vida; Política; Esporte; Tabloide; Outro
da: Mediesektion: Forretning og finans; Underholdning; Generelle nyheder; Livsstil; Politik; Sport; Tabloid; Andet
de: Medienbereich: Business und Finanzierung; Unterhaltung; Allgemeine Nachrichten; Lifestyle; Politik; Sport; Tabloid; Sonstiges
sv: Avsnittet Media: Ekonomi & finans; Underhållning; Allmänna nyheter; Livsstil; Politik; Sport; Tabloid; Annat
pt-PT: Secção de conteúdo multimédia: Negócios e finanças; Entretenimento; Noticias gerais; Estilo de vida; Política; Desporto; Tabloide; Outro
ja: メディアセクション: ビジネス・ファイナンス; エンターテイメント; 一般ニュース; ライフスタイル; 政治; スポーツ; タブロイド; その他
nb: Medieseksjon: Business & finans; Underholdning; Generelle nyheter; Livsstil; Politikk; Sport; Tabloid; Annen
ro-RO: Secțiunea media: Afaceri și finanțe; Artă și divertisment; Știri; Stil de viață; Politică; Sport; Tabloid; Altele
ru: Раздел СМИ: Бизнес и финансы; Развлечения; Общие новости; Образ жизни; Политика; Спорт; Таблоиды; Другое
lt-LT: Žiniasklaidos skiltis: Verslas ir finansai; Pramogos; Bendrosios naujienos; Gyvenimo būdas; Politika; Sportas; Bulvarinės naujienos; Kita
vi: Phần truyền thông: Kinh doanh và tài chính; Giải trí; Tin tức tổng hợp; Phong cách sống; Chính trị; Sport; Tabloid; Khác
el: Κατηγορία μέσων: Επιχειρήσεις και οικονομικά; Ψυχαγωγία; Γενικά νέα; Τρόπος ζωής; Πολιτική; Αθλητισμός; Σκανδαλοθηρικά θέματα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Медиен раздел: Бизнес и финанси; Забавления; Общи новини; Начин на живот; Политика; Спорт; Таблоид; Други
cs: Mediální téma: Obchod a finance; Zábava; Obecné zprávy; Životní styl; Politika; Sport; Tabloid; Jiné
es: Sección de medios: Negocios y finanzas; Entretenimiento; Noticias generales; Estilo de vida; Política; Deportivo; Tabloide; Otros
hu: Újságrovat: Üzlet és pénzügy; Szórakozás; Általános hírek; Életmód; Politika; Sport; Bulvárlap; Egyéb
nl: Mediasectie: Bedrijf en financiering; Entertainment; Algemeen nieuws; Levensstijl; Politiek; Sport; Tabloid; Andere